Massachusetts, session 194th, H3747.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1.  Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2018 
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 156 by inserting after the word “provided,” the 
following:-   
“that the registrar shall not furnish a number plate with the identical sequence of 
horizontally aligned alphanumeric characters as another active number plate; and provided 
further,”.     
SECTION 2.  The registrar shall issue a new registration number and number plates to a 
registrant, at the registrant’s option upon application, without charge, whose number plate shares 

of 2 9 the identical sequence of horizontally aligned alphanumeric characters with another active 
number plate.   
SECTION 3.  Not later than January 1, 2025, the registrar shall (i) identify all registrants 
with number plates that share the identical sequence of horizontally aligned alphanumeric 
characters with another active number plate and (ii) provide written notice to such registrants 
informing them of same and of the registrar’s obligations under section 2.    
SECTION 4.  Municipal, county, and state agencies and other governmental entities, 
including but not limited to law enforcement agencies and personnel, the Massachusetts 
department of transportation, and Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, and those acting 
on their behalf, shall include all vertically stacked characters that are part of a registration 
number and shall note whether a plate is a specialty, distinctive, commercial or other plate series 
when documenting or otherwise recording a motor vehicle or trailer plate number for the purpose 
of assessing any violation, fine, surcharge, toll, or fee.